Tennessee, session 114, SB0350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 7, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
66-7-113.
(a) On and after July 1, 2025, a landlord shall not prohibit a tenant or a tenant's
guest from lawfully possessing, carrying, transporting, or storing a firearm, any part of a
firearm, or firearm ammunition in the tenant's home, apartment, or business; in a vehicle
located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the
leased premises; or in other locations controlled by the landlord as necessary to enter or
exit the tenant's home, apartment, or business, to enter or exit the leased premises, or to
enter or exit a vehicle located on the leased premises or in a parking area provided by
the landlord for tenants or tenants' guests.
(b)
(1) An existing lease that is in effect on July 1, 2025, that contains lease
terms relative to firearms that are in violation of subsection (a) may, for purposes
of other lease terms that do not violate subsection (a), remain in effect and must
be amended to comply with subsection (a) prior to July 1, 2026. However, on
and after July 1, 2025, any such lease terms relative to firearms that are in
violation of subsection (a) are void and unenforceable.
SB0350
001006
- 1 -

(2) An existing lease described in subdivision (b)(1) is not in violation of
subsection (a) until July 1, 2026, as long as the lease terms relative to firearms
that are in violation of subsection (a) are not enforced and the lease is amended
to comply with subsection (a) prior to July 1, 2026.
(3) This subsection (b) does not prohibit a landlord and tenant from
voluntarily entering into a new lease agreement prior to July 1, 2026, to replace
an existing lease that contains lease terms relative to firearms that are in
violation of subsection (a).
(c) A tenant who is adversely affected by a violation of subsection (a) may bring
a suit against the landlord for actual damages, punitive damages, and recovery of
attorney fees.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 28, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
66-28-206.
(a) On and after July 1, 2025, a landlord shall not prohibit a tenant or a tenant's
guest from lawfully possessing, carrying, transporting, or storing a firearm, any part of a
firearm, or firearm ammunition in the tenant's home, apartment, or business; in a vehicle
located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the
leased premises; or in other locations controlled by the landlord as necessary to enter or
exit the tenant's home, apartment, or business, to enter or exit the leased premises, or to
enter or exit a vehicle located on the leased premises or in a parking area provided by
the landlord for tenants or tenants' guests.
(b)
(1) An existing lease that is in effect on July 1, 2025, that contains lease
terms relative to firearms that are in violation of subsection (a) may, for purposes
- 2 - 001006

of other lease terms that do not violate subsection (a), remain in effect and must
be amended to comply with subsection (a) prior to July 1, 2026. However, on
and after July 1, 2025, any such lease terms relative to firearms that are in
violation of subsection (a) are void and unenforceable.
(2) An existing lease described in subdivision (b)(1) is not in violation of
subsection (a) until July 1, 2026, as long as the lease terms relative to firearms
that are in violation of subsection (a) are not enforced and the lease is amended
to comply with subsection (a) prior to July 1, 2026.
(3) This subsection (b) does not prohibit a landlord and tenant from
voluntarily entering into a new lease agreement prior to July 1, 2026 to replace
an existing lease that contains lease terms relative to firearms that are in
violation of subsection (a).
(c) A tenant who is adversely affected by a violation of subsection (a) may bring
a suit against the landlord for actual damages, punitive damages, and recovery of
attorney fees.
SECTION 3 Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-402(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(7) The rule or regulation does not violate § 66-28-206.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001006